Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska41-203
Motel, defined.

Motel shall mean a roadside hotel providing both lodging for travelers, whether in individual cabins or not, and garage or parking space for their motor vehicles.

Laws 1982, LB 547, § 3.